Alabama, session 2026rs, HB394.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) Freedom Quilting Bee Legacy is exempt
from paying any state sales and use taxes.
(b) Any county or municipality may exempt Freedom
Quilting Bee Legacy from the payment of county or municipal
sales and use taxes in accordance with Section 40-23-4.01,
Code of Alabama 1975.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on September
1, 2026.
Page 1